Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. Coal

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation §§ 155 to 157.

84 C.J.S. Taxation §§ 510 to 523.

§ 39-14-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Arm’s-length market or sales price” means the transaction price determined in connection with a bona fide arm’s length sale;

“Bona fide arm’s-length sale” means a transaction in cash or terms equivalent to cash for specified property rights after reasonable exposure in a competitive market between a willing, well informed and prudent buyer and seller with adverse economic interests and assuming neither party is acting under undue compulsion or duress;

“Department review” means, but is not limited to, corrections of clerical errors or reconciliations of tax reports with reports required by other state or federal agencies;

“Mine product valuation amendment” means a valuation adjustment determination made by the department including special directives;

“Mining or production” means drilling, blasting, loading, roadwork, overburden removal, pre-mouth of the mine reclamation, transportation from the point of severance to the mouth of the mine, and maintenance of facilities and equipment directly relating to any of the functions stated in this paragraph;

“Mouth of the mine” means the point at which a mineral is brought to the surface of the ground and is taken out of the pit, shaft or portal. For a surface mine, this point shall be the top of the ramp where the road or conveying system leaves the pit. For an in situ mine, the point shall be the wellhead;

“Processing” means crushing, sizing, milling, washing, drying, refining, upgrading, beneficiation, sampling, testing, treating, heating, separating, tailings or reject material disposal, compressing, storing, loading for shipment, transportation from the mouth of the mine to the loadout, transportation to market to the extent included in the price and provided by the producer, processing plant site and post-mouth of mine reclamation, maintenance of facilities and equipment relating to any of the functions stated in this paragraph, and any other function after severance that changes the physical or chemical characteristics or enhances the marketability of the mineral;

“Purchaser” means the first purchaser who acquires the produced valuable coal deposit from the taxpayer for value;

“Severance tax” means an excise tax imposed on the present and continuing privilege of removing, extracting, severing or producing any mineral in this state;

Beginning January 1, 1989, “taxable value” means one hundred percent (100%) of the fair market value of the gross product of minerals and mine products;

“Transportation to market provided by a third party” means the costs incurred for any movement of a mineral which is performed by a third party, after completion of all mining and processing functions, beyond the point of loading for shipment to the customer, commonly referred to as the loadout, established by contract or by government regulations;

“Transportation to market provided by the producer” means the costs incurred for any movement of a mineral which is performed by the producer beyond the point of loading for shipment to the customer, commonly referred to as the loadout, completed by the employees of the producer using equipment owned by the producer;

“Underground coal” means coal mined by methods of man-made excavation underneath the surface of the earth utilizing shafts, tunnels or lifts, including planes connected with excavations penetrating the mineral stratum;

“Unreported production” means production volume for which no tax report was filed for the reporting period by the taxpayer or his agent;

“Value of the gross product” means fair market value as prescribed by W.S.

39-11-101

, less any deductions and exemption allowed by Wyoming law or rules.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 59, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Mouth of the mine defined.—

Board of Equalization
properly accepted the Department of Revenue's interpretation of “mouth
of the mine,” as used in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-101(a)(vi), given the statute's plain language indicating that the
mouth of the mine was located at the point where the coal reached
the surface of the ground. Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2017 WY 6, 387 P.3d 725,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2017).

Labor Defined. —

The plain meaning of “labor” in the context of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-14-103

is the work necessary to accomplish the act of mining, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-101(a)(v) (2005) defines mining or production as drilling, blasting, loading, roadwork, overburden removal, pre-mouth of the mine reclamation, transportation from the point of severance to the mouth of the mine, and maintenance of facilities and equipment directly relating to any of the functions stated in the paragraph. Thus, whatever it costs the employer to obtain the necessary work to accomplish the mining is the cost of labor, and wages are a component of the direct cost of labor; “mining labor” in the context of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-14-103

is not a term of art and does not mean only actual hourly wage or salary paid and nothing else.
Powder River Coal Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 137, 145 P.3d 442,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Powder River Coal Co. v. Wyo. State Bd. of Equalization, 2002 WY 5, 38 P.3d 423,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Wyodak Resources Dev. Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 9 P.3d 987,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2000); Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002); BP America Prod. Co. v. Department of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Mar. 14, 2006).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 191.03, 193.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 39-14-102.
Administration; confidentiality.

The department shall annually value and assess the gross product of all mines and mining claims at its fair market value for taxation.

Based upon the information received or procured pursuant to W.S. 39-14-107(a) or 39-14-108(a) and except as otherwise provided, the department shall annually value the gross product for the preceding calendar year, in appropriate unit measures of all mines and mining claims from which valuable deposits are produced.

Except as otherwise provided, in the event the product as defined in W.S. 39-14-103(b)(iii) is not sold at the mouth of the mine by bona fide arms-length sale, or if the product of the mine is used without sale, the department shall determine the fair market value by application of recognized appraisal techniques.

Annually, on or before June 1, or as soon thereafter as the fair market value is determined, the department shall certify the valuation determined by the department to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located, to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county.

All taxpayer returns and return information shall be confidential and, except as authorized below, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall disclose any such information obtained by him in connection with his service as an officer or employee.

As used in this section, taxpayer returns and return information shall include, but not be limited to, all statements, reports, summaries and all other data and documents under audit or provided by the taxpayer in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 39-14-107(a) and related provision.

Without written authorization from the taxpayer, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall release taxpayer returns and return information pertaining to taxes imposed by this article, except:

Information may be released to the governor or his designee, members of the board, to employees of the department of audit, the department of revenue, the consensus revenue estimating group and to the attorney general;

Upon prior notice to the taxpayer, information may be released by the department, upon written application, to any other governmental entity if the governmental entity shows sufficient reason to obtain the information for official business;

Information is admissible in court or administrative proceedings related to mineral taxes or government royalties.

Any person receiving information pursuant to paragraph (g)(ii) of this section shall sign an agreement with the department to keep the information confidential.

Units of production reported by the taxpayer and the taxpayer’s taxable value are not confidential and may be released without qualification.

Any person who negligently violates subsections (e) through (j) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Any person who intentionally violates subsections (e) through (j) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and imprisoned for not more than one (1) year.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 68, § 1.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1; 2000, ch. 68, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Valuation method for non-arms length sales. —

In an action challenging the valuation of coal, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-103(b)(viii) did not apply to the coal mine's non-arms length coal sales; Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-102(c) allowed the use of comparable sales to establish the fair market value of the coal sold. Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002).

Royalty. —

As a component of the value of coal as it comes from the mine, royalty must be included at its actual, not an artificial, amount. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Royalty is a full component of the value of the coal at the mine, and is not to be apportioned between mining and processing as indirect costs may be. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Federal black lung tax included in value. —

The state board of equalization (now department) did not err, in determining the taxable value for ad valorem and severance tax purposes of coal produced by a coal company, by including all of the federal black lung excise tax paid to the company by its customers in the value of the coal at the mine mouth, rather than to exclude that portion of the amount paid on the value added to the coal by nontaxable transportation and processing activities. Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Cost of loading coal in a strip mine

should be considered a mining expense rather than an expense of transportation and processing. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Reporting of oil production should be done at wellhead. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue properly reallocated a production company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county because former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-2-201(e) always contemplated that reporting of oil production should be done at the wellhead, and the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. Ann § 39-2-213 (currently Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-207(a)(iii)) did not constitute a ‘change,’ but only a restatement of what general practice had always been contemplated, the practice that was generally in place, and the practice that should generally continue. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Failure to consider cost of trucking to selling point is discriminatory.

J. Ray McDermott & Co. v. Hudson, 370 P.2d 364,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1962).

Costs of transportation are not to be included

in the value fixed for mineral products. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

In fixing the value of the gross product of several mines, the department cannot include a presumed cost for transporting the mineral products to and placing them in a hypothetical storage facility. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

Reclamation costs should be allowed as part of transportation and processing costs

deducted from the value of coal. Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Expenses of production and severance taxes from the prior year

were properly included in making its allocation of indirect costs to arrive at the estimated true value of the coal at the mouth of the mine. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Application of subsection (b) not foreclosed where mine productsnot stored. —

While a mining company may not place mine products in bins, tanks, tipples, silos, stockpiles or other storage prior to transportation to market, this does not foreclose the application of subsection (b). Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

Phrase at end of subsection (a) is ambiguous. —

The phrase “at the fair cash market value of the product at the mine or mining claim where produced, after the mining or production process is completed,” as used in subsection (a), is ambiguous, since different conclusions may be reached as to when the mining or production process is completed in an instance in which all of the factors mentioned in subsection (b) are not present. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

When mining process deemed completed. —

The first phrase of subsection (b) makes it quite clear that the mining or production process is deemed completed when the product is removed from the mine and not before. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

Mining products are not valued until they have been removed from mine

in either railroad cars or trucks. In each instance that point is determinable. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 39-14-103.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

There is levied a severance tax on the value of the gross product for the privilege of severing or extracting both surface and underground coal in the state. The severance tax imposed by this article may be in addition to other taxes, including but not limited to the ad valorem taxes imposed by W.S.

39-13-104

.

Basis of tax (valuation). The following shall apply:

Coal shall be valued for taxation as provided in this subsection;

The value of the gross product shall be the fair market value of the product at the mouth of the mine where produced, after the mining or production process is completed;

Except as otherwise provided, the mining or production process is deemed completed when the mineral product reaches the mouth of the mine. In no event shall the value of the mineral product include any processing functions or operations regardless of where the processing is performed;

Except as otherwise provided, if the product as defined in paragraph (iii) of this subsection is sold at the mouth of the mine, the fair market value shall be deemed to be the price established by bona fide arms-length sale;

In the event the product as defined in paragraph (iii) of this subsection is sold at the mouth of the mine without further movement or processing, the fair market value shall be the price established by bona fide arms-length sale less exempt royalties;

In the event the product as defined in paragraph (iii) of this subsection is not sold at the mouth of the mine by bona fide arms-length sale, or, except as otherwise provided, if the product of the mine is used without sale, the department shall determine the fair market value of coal in accordance with paragraph (vii), (viii), (ix) or (x) of this subsection;

For coal sold away from the mouth of the mine pursuant to a bona fide arms-length sale, the department shall calculate the fair market value of coal by multiplying the sales value of extracted coal, less transportation to market provided by a third party to the extent included in sales value, all royalties, ad valorem production taxes, severance taxes, black lung excise taxes and abandoned mine lands fees, by the ratio of direct mining costs to total direct costs. Nonexempt royalties, ad valorem production taxes, severance taxes, black lung excise taxes and abandoned mine lands fees shall then be added to determine fair market value. For purposes of this paragraph:

The sales value of extracted coal shall be the selling price pursuant to an arms-length contract. To the extent not included in the selling price pursuant to an arms-length contract, and to the extent that the following represent partial consideration for the value of the coal, sales value shall include the value per ton attributable to the extracted coal for any consideration provided to the seller in the form of heat content adjustments, price escalations or de-escalations, expense reimbursements, capital, facilities or equipment, services for mining, handling, processing or transporting the coal at or near the mine site, or any payment received for the current or past sale of extracted coal, by or on behalf of the purchaser. Sales value per ton shall include consideration provided for the deferral of extraction and sale in the taxable period in which the purchaser receives credit for the payment as a result of subsequent extraction and sale of the deferred production;

Direct mining costs include mining labor including mine foremen and supervisory personnel whose primary responsibility is extraction of coal, supplies used for mining, mining equipment depreciation, fuel, power and other utilities used for mining, maintenance of mining equipment, coal transportation from the point of severance to the mouth of the mine, and any other direct costs incurred prior to the mouth of the mine that are specifically attributable to the mining operation;

Total direct costs include direct mining costs determined under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph plus mineral processing labor including plant foremen and supervisory personnel whose primary responsibility is processing coal, supplies used for processing, processing plant and equipment depreciation, fuel, power and other utilities used for processing, maintenance of processing equipment, coal transportation from the mouth of the mine to the point of shipment, coal transportation to market to the extent included in the price and provided by the producer, and any other direct costs incurred that are specifically attributable to the mining, processing or transportation of coal up to the point of loading for shipment to market;

Indirect costs, royalties, ad valorem production taxes, severance taxes, black lung excise taxes and abandoned mine lands fees shall not be included in the computation of the ratio set forth in this paragraph. Indirect costs include but are not limited to allocations of corporate overhead, data processing costs, accounting, legal and clerical costs, and other general and administrative costs which cannot be specifically attributed to an operational function without allocation.

For coal used without sale, or coal not sold pursuant to a bona fide arms-length agreement, the sales value for the purposes of paragraph (vii) of this subsection shall be the fair market value of coal which is comparable in the quality, quantity, terms and conditions under which the coal is being used or sold, both in the spot market and through long-term agreements negotiated within the previous twelve (12) months, multiplied by the respective number of tons used or sold for each reporting period;

Notwithstanding paragraph (viii) of this subsection, the sales value for purposes of paragraph (vii) of this subsection for coal used as a feedstock in a coal enhancement process which has been subjected to normal processes necessary to achieve marketability, shall be the market value of comparable coal as determined by this paragraph. The market value of comparable coal attributable to feedstock coal shall be:

A representative selling price received or receivable which shall be determined by the first of the following subdivisions that is applicable, multiplied by the total feedstock tons used in each reporting period:

Arms-length price of comparable coal produced from the same mine and sold under comparable terms, or if a comparable coal price is not available from the same mine, the arms-length price of comparable coal produced from other mines in the area and sold under comparable terms;

Price reported to a public utility commission for comparable coal produced from the same mine and sold under comparable terms, or if a comparable coal price is not available from the same mine, the price reported to a public utility commission for comparable coal produced from other mines in the area and sold under comparable terms;

Other published or publicly available market prices for comparable coal produced from mines in the area and sold under comparable terms.

If subparagraph (A) of this paragraph is not applicable, then the sales value for coal used as a feedstock shall be the total arms-length selling price of the enhanced coal sold during the reporting period multiplied by the total of the enhanced tons sold.

In the event that unique or unusual circumstances exist such that the department or the taxpayer is unable to determine the value of the gross product of coal from a mine or mining claim by application of the methods provided in this subsection, the taxpayer may petition the department for approval to use an alternate valuation method. The department shall approve or deny the use of an alternate valuation method and shall so inform the parties within forty-five (45) days of the date the petition is filed.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

In the case of the gross product of all mines and mining claims produced under lease, the lessor is liable for the payment of ad valorem taxes on the product removed only to the extent of the lessor’s retained interest under the lease, whether royalty or otherwise, and the lessee or his assignee is liable for all other ad valorem taxes due on production under the lease;

Any taxpayer paying the taxes imposed by this article on any valuable deposit may deduct the severance taxes paid from any amounts due or to become due to the interest owners of such valuable deposit in proportion to the interest ownership;

Any person extracting valuable products subject to this chapter and any person owning an interest in the valuable products to the extent of their interest ownership are liable for the payment of the severance taxes imposed by this article together with any penalties and interest.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1.

Valuation method for non-arms length sales. —

In an action challenging the valuation of coal, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-103(b)(viii) did not apply to the coal mine's non-arms length coal sales; Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-102(c) allowed the use of comparable sales to establish the fair market value of the coal sold. Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002).

Road move expenses. —

The Wyoming state board of equalization did not err in affirming the department of revenue's determination that the petitioner's road move expenses incurred during coal production years 1990-1992 were direct mining costs rather than indirect costs for the purposes of valuing the petitioner's coal production during those same years as the expenses at issue were, by agreement of the parties, specifically attributable to the mining operation rather than general and administrative costs which could not be specifically attributed to an operational function without allocation. Wyodak Resources Dev. Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 9 P.3d 987,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2000).

Direct mining costs. —

The term “direct mining costs” under subparagraph (b)(vii)(B) was not intended to include such expenses as a bonus payment required for the purchase of the coal lease; had the legislature intended to include costs not associated with the actual act of mining, it would have done so expressly and not by the use of a catch-all phrase that follows a very detailed list of costs incurred in the physical act of mining. Powder River Coal Co. v. Wyo. State Bd. of Equalization, 2002 WY 5, 38 P.3d 423,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. Feb. 27, 2002).

A lease bonus in federal coal lease was not a royalty nor was it a direct mining cost as contemplated by the statute and regulations; the legislature intended for bonus payments to be treated as an indirect cost benefiting the entire operation. Powder River Coal Co. v. Wyo. State Bd. of Equalization, 2002 WY 5, 38 P.3d 423,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. Feb. 27, 2002).

The plain meaning of “labor” in the context of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-14-103

is the work necessary to accomplish the act of mining, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-101(a)(v) (2005) defines mining or production as drilling, blasting, loading, roadwork, overburden removal, pre-mouth of the mine reclamation, transportation from the point of severance to the mouth of the mine, and maintenance of facilities and equipment directly relating to any of the functions stated in the paragraph. Thus, whatever it costs the employer to obtain the necessary work to accomplish the mining is the cost of labor, and wages are a component of the direct cost of labor; “mining labor” in the context of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-14-103

is not a term of art and does not mean only actual hourly wage or salary paid and nothing else.
Powder River Coal Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 137, 145 P.3d 442,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2006).

When all the provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-14-103

are read together, the legislature simply means all costs, a portion of which are directly associated with a particular function, should be attributed to that function in some reasonable way; the indirect cost catch-all phrase in §

39-14-103

(b)(vii)(D), other general and administrative costs which cannot be specifically attributed to an operational function without allocation, simply means costs similar to those specifically listed which are not directly related to a function and, therefore, must be allocated by the direct cost formula. The words “without allocation” in § 39-14-103(b)(vii)(D) are not intended to prevent costs directly associated with a particular function from being considered as direct costs simply because they had to be allocated among the functions by some agreed upon formula, either because of the level of detail provided by the taxpayer's accounting system or because of the nature of the cost; the more reasonable interpretation of that language suggests the catch-all phrase means other costs similar in nature to the listed indirect costs and for which no reasonable formula exists to allocate those costs among functions except the direct cost ratio.
Powder River Coal Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 137, 145 P.3d 442,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2006).

Quoted in

Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2017 WY 6, 387 P.3d 725,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 39-14-104.
Tax rate.

The total severance tax rate for surface coal shall be six and one-half percent (6.5%). This rate comprises one and one-half percent (1.5%) imposed by Wyoming constitution article 15, section 19, and five percent (5%) imposed statutorily. The tax shall be distributed as provided in W.S.

39-14-111

and is imposed as follows:

One and one-half percent (1.5%); plus

One-half percent (.5%); plus

Two percent (2%); plus

One and one-half percent (1.5%); plus

One percent (1%).

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 102, § 2.

The total severance tax rate for underground coal shall be three and three-quarters percent (3.75%). The tax shall be distributed as provided in W.S.

39-14-111

and is imposed as follows:

One and one-half percent (1.5%); plus

One and one-quarter percent (1.25%); plus

One percent (1%).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2016 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 102, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “Except as otherwise provided by
W.S.

39-14-105

” and made related changes in (a).

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 102, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “six and one-half percent (6.5%)” for “seven percent (7%)” in the first sentence, “five percent (5%)” for “five and one-half percent (5.5%)” in the second sentence; and repealed former (a)(vi), which read, “One-half percent (.5%).”

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 102, § 3, provides, “This act shall apply to surface coal produced on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 39-14-105.
Exemptions.

Coal has no value and is exempt from taxation if it is consumed prior to sale for the purpose of treating or processing coal produced from the same mine.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 16, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

Surface coal transported to market outside of North America using a coal export terminal located in Canada or Mexico is exempt from the severance taxes imposed by W.S. 39-14-104(a)(iii) and (v). The taxpayer shall submit all information and documentation as specified by the department to determine the taxpayer’s qualification for the exemption. This subsection is repealed effective July 1, 2030 or upon the export in any calendar year through United States coal export terminals to markets outside of North America of a combined ten million (10,000,000) tons of surface coal subject to the tax as determined by the department of revenue and certified to the governor, whichever is sooner.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 64, § 1; 2001, ch. 177, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 2; 2016 ch. 16, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 139, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed former (d) pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (b) and (c).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (e).

§ 39-14-106.
Licenses; permits.

There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses and permits for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.